District of Columbia statutes.
15-371

Saving clause.

This subchapter does not prevent the recognition under principles of comity or otherwise of a foreign-country judgment not within the scope of this subchapter.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 11 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.